Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB937.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 10 of this Act:
(1) "Community benefits agreement package" or "CBA package" means the binding
agreement and supporting documentation submitted with the site review plan that
identifies the community benefits to which the developer has committed, broken
out by interim, immediate, and long-term benefits, including funding
mechanisms, verification, and signatures of the developer or end user and the
receiving local government or beneficiary;
(2) "Community benefits analysis" or "CBA" means a narrative and quantitative
analysis submitted with the community impact report evaluating potential
community benefits, infrastructure improvements, public-resource impacts, and
associated costs or feasibility;
(3) "Community impact report" or "CIR" means a publicly available, licensed,
professional engineer-sealed document that discloses project impacts and
commitments;
(4) "Conditional use permit" or "CUP" has the same meaning as in KRS 100.111;
(5) "HARP" means a high intensity technological infrastructure administrative
review permit;
(6) "High intensity technological infrastructure" or "HITI" means a facility,
including but not limited to data centers, together with associated substations,
intake and outfall works, fuel storage, and backup generation, that has an
expected or actual monthly electrical load factor of sixty percent (60%) or
greater, with significant associated heat rejection and water-cooling needs;
(7) "Local government" means any city, county, charter county government, urban-
Page 1 of 9
XXXX 3/4/2026 1:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2447
county government, consolidated local government, unified local government, or
a special district; and
(8) "Site review plan" or "SRP" means a sealed engineering package submitted
after discretionary approval to verify compliance with the requirements of
Sections 1 to 10 of this Act and community impact report commitments.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) The provisions of Sections 1 to 10 of this Act shall not limit or preempt more
stringent local ordinances, land use regulations, impact mitigation
requirements, design standards, or conditions of approval adopted by local
governments.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, local governments
shall retain all authority to adopt standards and requirements more
stringent than those reflected in applicable federal or state permits, building
codes, or national engineering standards.
(2) Local governments shall retain discretionary authority to approve with conditions
or deny proposals where substantial evidence demonstrates that impacts cannot
be mitigated; however, approval with conditions is preferred where feasible.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) In jurisdictions with planning and zoning, a HITI project shall obtain one (1) of
the following from the planning commission or locally established HITI review
board prior to construction:
(a) A CUP when located outside heavy-industrial districts or in sensitive
contexts designated by local ordinance; or
(b) A HARP when located within heavy-industrial districts.
(2) A local government may, by ordinance, certify its board of adjustment for HITI
Page 2 of 9
XXXX 3/4/2026 1:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2447
review authority if the board has adopted HITI procedures, completed technical
and hearing training, and retained independent experts through the applicant-
funded escrow required by Section 4 of this Act.
(3) CUP decisions are discretionary and shall be supported by substantial evidence in
the record. HARP approvals are ministerial upon a complete and compliant
record, and approvals may impose enforceable conditions necessary to ensure
compliance with CIR and SRP commitments and applicable law.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) In any county lacking planning and zoning authority to issue a CUP or HARP, a
HITI shall not commence construction without a construction certificate issued
by an entity identified in subsection (2) of this section that provides procedural
equivalents to the pathways in Section 3 of this Act, which shall include:
(a) A professional engineer-sealed CIR;
(b) Mailed notice and a public hearing held in the host county;
(c) A developer-funded escrow deposit in an amount sufficient to cover the
actual and reasonable costs of independent technical review and inspection
retained by the decision-making body, which shall be replenished upon
request and refunded upon conclusion of review;
(d) Utility validation letters;
(e) An SRP prior to the issuance of construction permits; and
(f) Conversion of the CBA into a CBA package.
(2) The Kentucky State Board on Electric Generation and Transmission Siting
established in KRS 278.702, or an alternative panel designated jointly by the
Energy and Environment Cabinet and the Department for Local Government,
shall administer construction certificates for HITI in counties without planning
and zoning.
Page 3 of 9
XXXX 3/4/2026 1:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2447
(3) A construction certificate review established under subsection (2) of this
sectionpanel shall include the following persons who shall participate fully in all
hearings, deliberations, and issuing conditions of approval:
(a) Two (2) voting representatives from the host community:
(b) The county judge/executive from the host community or designee; and
(c) An additional representative designated by the fiscal court for the host
community or, if applicable, by a joint city-county governing body.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The HITI project owner and operator of record shall be disclosed prior to any
public hearing on the CUP, HARP, or construction certificate.
(2) A confidentiality agreement relating to the siting, construction, or operation of a
HITI project shall not restrict a governing body, its officers, or its retained
independent consultants from disclosing the identity of the owner or operator, the
nature and scale of proposed facilities, or anticipated demands on public
infrastructure as presented in the CIR and SRP. Proprietary technical details
may be redacted pursuant KRS 61.870 to 61.884, but not the disclosures required
in this subsection.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
The CIR shall be prepared, signed, and sealed under the responsible charge of a
Kentucky-licensed professional engineer and include at minimum the following:
(1) An executive summary, not to exceed two (2) pages, typewritten on white paper,
size eight and one-half (8-1/2) by eleven (11) inches, single-spaced in a twelve
(12) point font, which shall include:
(a) The project purpose, site, schedule, high-level impacts, and mitigations; and
(b) The order of probable construction costs with class accuracy, basis, and
Page 4 of 9
XXXX 3/4/2026 1:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2447
major costs;
(2) The following graphics and visuals without substitutions:
(a) Plan view site layout showing building footprints, including any substations,
tanks, generators, intake or outfall structures, stormwater facilities, fire
lanes, and security areas;
(b) Vicinity and context maps of at least a one (1) mile radius around the HITI
showing zoning, neighborhoods, schools, public facilities, waterways, and
floodplains;
(c) Massing and elevations for principal buildings and illustrative renderings
from public rights-of-way;
(d) Electric interconnection one (1) line diagrams and conceptual utility
diagrams, including diagrams for public water supply, discharge mains, and
gas lines if applicable;
(e) Water balance schematics and conceptual cooling process diagrams;
(f) Traffic and haul-route maps, with estimated volumes by phase; and
(g) If modeling is performed, hydraulic model figures, noise isopleths, lighting
photometrics and glare diagrams, and thermal plume graphics where
surface discharge is proposed;
(3) The following water sourcing narratives, as applicable:
(a) For public water systems, sources, service points, hydraulic modeling
summaries, upgrades and cost responsibility, and redundancy and
emergency supply provisions;
(b) For surface water, intake and outfall locations, expected withdrawals and
discharges, seasonal variations, hydraulic and thermal summaries,
entrainment and impingement protections, and permitting paths; and
(c) 1. For groundwater, hydrogeologic settings, wellfield concepts, modeling
summaries, well monitoring programs, sealed by a Kentucky
Page 5 of 9
XXXX 3/4/2026 1:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2447
professional engineer or geologist.
2. Where site access for groundwater testing is not yet obtained, the CIR
may include a desktop hydrogeologic assessment based on publicly
available data, regional aquifer studies, and state groundwater maps.
Full field-verified modeling, if groundwater is selected as the primary
water source, shall be included in the SRP;
(4) Operational approach narratives, for land-use compatibility purposes only, which
shall include:
(a) Cooling configuration, emergency generation, and controls for type, count,
and fuel;
(b) Stormwater strategy, construction sequencing, traffic management,
monitoring and incident reporting cadence;
(c) Nonsensitive cybersecurity description, waste-heat handling, lighting
systems, noise control; and
(d) Diesel and fuel storage, fire protection, and on-site security;
(5) Utility validation letters, which shall include:
(a) Electric interconnection capacity, required transmission and distribution
upgrades, cost allocation, and a narrative assessment of retail rate impacts
on existing customers; and
(b) Publicly supplied water capacity and redundancy, required upgrades, cost
allocation, and a narrative assessment of retail rate impacts on existing
customers; and
(6) Notarized affidavits of accuracy by the applicant and principal preparers and
Kentucky-licensed professional engineer seals on all applicable components.
SECTION 7. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The SRP shall be prepared and sealed by appropriate Kentucky-licensed design
Page 6 of 9
XXXX 3/4/2026 1:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2447
professionals and shall include:
(a) Engineering drawings and basis-of-design memoranda for:
1. Civil, architectural, structural, electrical components, including
substation concepts, mechanical and process components;
2. Fire protection at a Class 3 level or equivalent; and
3. Preliminary specification schedules for major equipment;
(b) Final utility coordination documents and an updated water-sourcing
package aligned to the selected pathway, and pretreatment and effluent
concepts, if applicable;
(c) Environmental and stormwater design summaries, spill prevention, and
secondary containment layout where fuels or oils are present, and
monitoring points and reporting cadence;
(d) Construction sequencing, haul-route management, and traffic control,
emergency access geometry, hydrants and water supply, and fire alarm and
suppression concepts;
(e) Appropriate compliance cross-walk mapping for CUP, HARP, and
construction certificate conditions and CIR commitments to SRP features
and drawings; and
(f) A community benefits agreement package ready for execution.
(2) With regard to SRP enforcement:
(a) A grading, building, or utility release shall not be issued until the SRP is
accepted and approved as conforming to conditions and CIR commitments;
(b) The decision-making body may issue stop work orders, withhold certificates
of occupancy, and require corrections where the SRP is inadequate,
inconsistent, or misleading; and
(c) Material deviations discovered at SRP shall require a CUP or HARP
amendment or construction-certificate amendment, as applicable.
Page 7 of 9
XXXX 3/4/2026 1:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2447
(3) In heavy-industrial districts proceeding under a HARP, a grading, building, or
utility interconnection shall not approved until a HARP is issued and the SRP is
approved. The governing body may issue stop work orders, withhold certificates
of occupancy, and impose civil penalties for noncompliance.
SECTION 8. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
A community benefits agreement package required by subsection (1)(f) Section 7 of
this Act at a minimum shall include the following:
(1) Benefit categories and deliverables, dollar values or in-kind valuations,
disbursement schedules, and local vendor and labor targets;
(2) Quarterly or semiannual public reporting posted on the local government
website; and
(3) Escrow or bond amounts, dispute-resolution mechanisms, default and step-in
terms, and tie-ins to public incentives, if any.
SECTION 9. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The decision-making body of a local government shall provide mailed notice to
owners and addressed occupants within one (1) mile of the proposed HITI project
boundary and shall provide publication and website posting where available or
practicable. A public hearing shall be held prior to any CUP decision or
construction-certificate issuance.
(2) The decision-making body of a local government shall first consider conditions
that would mitigate identified incompatibilities between the proposed use of a
HITI site and its zoned use. If substantial evidence demonstrates that impacts
cannot be mitigated, the CUP may be denied, with written findings.
(3) All decisions under Sections 1 to 10 of this Act shall be supported by substantial
evidence in the record.
Page 8 of 9
XXXX 3/4/2026 1:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2447
(4) Appeals from final actions under Sections 1 to 10 of this Act shall be taken in
accordance with applicable law governing appeals from conditional use and
planning commission decisions.
SECTION 10. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 10 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Any material expansion, parcel acquisition, utility-demand increase,
infrastructure modification, or transition to on-site electricity generation shall
require prior written approval by CUP amendment, HARP modification, or
construction-certificate amendment, as applicable.
(2) HITI project siting and construction applicants shall attest that design and
operations will comply with all applicable federal and state requirements and
recognized industry standards appropriate to HITI operations. The CIR or SRP
shall include a non-exhaustive listing of referenced standards used as the basis of
design.
Page 9 of 9
XXXX 3/4/2026 1:24 PM Jacketed